Maryland, session 2025, HB0365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–108.
(a) A person may not open or review an expunged record or disclose to another
person any information from that record without a court order from:
(1) the court that ordered the record expunged; or
(2) the District Court that has venue in the case of a police record expunged
under § 10–103 of this subtitle.
(b) A court may order the opening or review of an expunged record or the
disclosure of information from that record:
(1) after notice to the person whom the record concerns, a hearing, and the
showing of good cause; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0365*

HOUSE BILL 365
(2) on an ex parte order, as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
(c) (1) The court may pass an ex parte order allowing access to an expunged
record, without notice to the person who is the subject of that record, on a verified petition
filed by a State’s Attorney alleging that:
(i) the expunged record is needed by a law enforcement unit for a
pending criminal investigation; and
(ii) the investigation will be jeopardized or life or property will be
endangered without immediate access to the expunged record.
(2) In an ex parte order, the court may not allow a copy of the expunged
record to be made.
(d) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year
or both.
(2) In addition to the penalties provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection,
an official or employee of the State or a political subdivision of the State who is convicted
under this section may be removed or dismissed from public service.
(E) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THE
DISCLOSURE OF ANY RECORD THAT:
(1) CONTAINS INFORMATION THAT IS ALSO CONTAINED IN AN
EXPUNGED RECORD;
(2) IS FORMATTED TO FACILITATE RESEARCH; AND
(3) CONTAINS DE–IDENTIFIED CASE DATA.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.